Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska85-932
Continuing education for occupations and professions, defined.

Continuing education for occupations and professions shall mean training or education that is not a part of a terminal degree or certificate program, but is related to an individual's existing or proposed area of occupation or profession.

Laws 1978, LB 756, § 16.